Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.010

Designation.

The state university located and established in Pullman, Whitman county, shall be designated Washington State University.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.010. Prior: 1959 c 77 s 1; 1905 c 53 s 1; 1891 c 145 s 1; RRS s 4567. Formerly RCW 28.80.010.]